Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 2. Constitutional Amendments and Executive Orders.

Sec. 24.08.200.
Constitutional amendments.

The legislature may propose amendments to the state constitution through the adoption of a joint resolution by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the membership of each house.
Resolutions proposing constitutional amendments shall be treated as bills.

History.

(§ 41 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.130(a).
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. XIII, § 1.

Sec. 24.08.210.
Executive orders.

An executive order proposing a change in the executive branch and requiring the force of law under art. III, sec. 23, Constitution of the State of Alaska shall be submitted to the presiding officer of each house on the day the house organizes.
The legislature has 60 days of a regular session, or a full session if of shorter duration to disapprove the order.
Unless disapproved by a special concurrent resolution introduced in either house, concurred in by a majority of the members in joint session, the order becomes effective at a date thereafter to be designated by the governor.
An order submitted to but not disapproved by the legislature shall be published in the bound session laws and any codification of state law.

History.

(§ 12 ch 47 SLA 1961)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.130(b).
Renumbered in 1985.